Utah statutes.
76-8-315.   Threatening elected officials -- Penalties for assault.

Assault on an elected official is a felony of the third degree if bodily injury is attempted or occurs, otherwise the assault is a class B misdemeanor.



Enacted by Chapter 330, 1983 General Session

